Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2107
Director; notice of acceptance.

The State of Nebraska shall transmit, through the Director of Agriculture, to the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States notice of acceptance of the provisions of the federal act specified in section 2-2101, and accompany such acceptance with a certified copy of sections 2-2101 to 2-2107.

Laws 1951, c. 4, § 7, p. 66.